Utah statutes.
49-11-610.   Benefits payable in name of beneficiary -- Delivery.
(1) (a)  Any benefits payable to a beneficiary shall be made in the name of
and delivered to the beneficiary or the lawfully appointed guardian or
conservator of the beneficiary, or delivered as otherwise ordered by a court
of competent jurisdiction under Title 75, Utah Uniform Probate Code.
(b)  If the benefit involves a payment not to exceed an amount authorized by
the Utah Uniform Probate Code to any one beneficiary, the office may, without
the appointment of a guardian or conservator or the giving of a bond, pay the
amount due to the beneficiary or to the persons assuming their support.
(c)  The payment shall be in either a lump sum or in monthly amounts.
(d)  The total of the payments made under this section shall fully discharge
and release the office from any further claims.
(2)  All continuing monthly benefits payable to beneficiaries upon the death
of a member or participant shall be effective on the first day of the month
following the date of death of the member or participant.
